Oklahoma, session 2025, SB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4201, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4201. In addition to the terms defined by the Oklahoma


Vessel and Motor Registration Act, for the purposes of the Oklahoma


Boating Safety Regulation Act:


1. “Buoy” means an anchored marker for marking a position on


the water, or a hazard, shoal or mooring, or any other prohibitive


activity area;


2. “Capacity plate” means a sign posted in view of the


operator’s station on a vessel which designates the maximum weight


capacity and horsepower restrictions of a vessel for safe operation;



Req. No. 203 Page 1


3. “Diver’s flag” means a red flag not less than twenty (20)


inches by twenty-four (24) inches with a four-inch white stripe


running from one upper corner to a diagonal lower corner, and such


flag is used to indicate a submerged diver;


4. “Emergency vessel” means any law enforcement vessel which is


legally authorized to operate in the emergency mode;


5. “Law enforcement vessel” means any vessel legally authorized


to operate under the color of law;


6. “Lienholder” means a person holding a security interest in a


vessel, as shown on the vessel title;


7. “Manipulate” means to guide, steer or otherwise control;


8. “Marine sewage” means any substance, treated or untreated,


that contains any of the waste products of humans or animals or


foodstuffs;


9. “Marine toilet” means any latrine, head, lavatory or toilet


intended to receive marine sewage and which is located on or in any


vessel;


10. “Operator” means the person who operates, has actual


physical control, or has charge of the navigation or use of a


vessel;


11. “Parasail” means any device which, when airborne, is used


or capable of being used for lifting or suspending a person who is


being or will be towed by a vessel;



Req. No. 203 Page 2


12. “Passenger” means any person riding in or upon any vessel


or being towed for recreation on water skis, an inner tube,


kneeboard, parasail or any similar device;


13. “Personal flotation device” means only a United States


Coast Guard approved flotation device;


14. “Personal watercraft” means a vessel which uses an inboard


motor powering a water jet pump as its primary source of motive


power and which is designed to be operated by a person sitting,


standing or kneeling on the vessel, rather than the conventional


manner of sitting or standing inside the vessel, or a vessel which


is similar in appearance and operation to a personal watercraft but


which is powered by an outboard or propeller driven motor, or a


vessel less than sixteen (16) feet in length which travels across


the water above or on a cushion of air provided by engines,


propellers or other means of propulsion;


15. “Sanctioned event” means any organized event on the waters


of this state, including but not limited to regattas, motorboat or


other boat races, marine parades, tournaments and exhibitions, which


is approved and permitted by an authorizing agency;


16. “Under way” means the movement of a vessel whether by


mechanical or nonmechanical means which is other than incidental to


the force of wind, waves or current; and


17. “Wake” means the track of waves left by a vessel or other


object moving through the water, and such waves are greater than the

Req. No. 203 Page 3


natural waves in the immediate area of the vessel, or are cresting


and showing white water, or may cause injury or damage to any person


or property; and


18. “Wide-angle convex rearview mirror” means a mirror, no less


than four (4) inches in size from bottom to top and across from side


to side, mounted firmly to the vessel to give the operator a full


and complete view beyond the rear of the vessel at all times.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 4212, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4212. A. 1. No person shall operate or give


permission to operate a vessel on any waters of this state for


towing a person or persons using parasails or on water skis, a


surfboard, or similar device unless there is in such vessel:


a. a person who is at least eight (8) years old, and who,


in addition to the operator, is in a position to


observe the progress of the person or persons being


towed,


b. if the vessel is not a personal watercraft, an


efficient wide angle wide-angle convex rear view


rearview mirror installed on such vessel in such


manner as to permit the person operating said such


vessel to face the direction of travel and be in a


position to observe the progress of the person or


persons being towed, or

Req. No. 203 Page 4


c. if the vessel is a personal watercraft, two efficient


wide angle wide-angle convex rear view rearview


mirrors installed on such vessel in such manner as to


permit the person operating such watercraft to face


the direction of travel and be in a position to


observe the progress of the person or person persons


being towed.


2. Water skiing shall be allowed with any watercraft which is


designed to accommodate two or more persons.


B. No person shall operate or give permission to operate a


vessel on any waters of this state for towing a person or persons


using parasails or on water skis, a surfboard, a sailboard, or


similar device nor shall any person engage in parasailing, water


skiing, surfboarding, sailboarding, or similar activity at any time


between the hours from sunset to sunrise or at such time visibility


due to other existing conditions is obscured so as to endanger life


or property.


C. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section do not


apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a


person or persons engaged in an activity authorized under Section


4205 of this title.


D. No person shall operate or give permission to operate or


manipulate any vessel, tow rope, or other device by which the


direction or location of parasails, water skis, a surfboard, or

Req. No. 203 Page 5


similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to


cause the parasails, water skis, surfboard, or similar device, or


any person thereon to collide with or strike against any object or


person.


E. 1. No person shall operate or give permission to operate a


personal watercraft or similar device capable of being remote


controlled by the skier unless such device is factory equipped with


an engine kill switch capable of shutting off the engine in the


event the skier becomes detached from the personal watercraft


device. A person operating a personal watercraft equipped by the


manufacturer with a lanyard type engine cutoff switch shall attach


such lanyard to his or her person, clothing, or personal flotation


device as appropriate for the specific vessel.


2. No person shall operate a personal watercraft at any time


between the hours from sunset to sunrise unless equipped with


prescribed lights.


F. 1. Whenever any person leaves the confines of any vessel,


other than a personal watercraft, and enters the waters in this


state between the hours from sunrise to sunset, the operator of the


vessel shall clearly display a red or orange flag on the vessel that


measures not less than twelve (12) inches by twelve (12) inches and


is visible for three hundred sixty degrees (360°) around the


horizon. The flag shall not be displayed when the watercraft is


engaged in towing any person but shall be displayed when such person

Req. No. 203 Page 6


has ceased being towed and has reentered the water. The provisions


of this subsection shall not apply to a watercraft that is moored or


anchored.


2. No operator shall knowingly operate any vessel in excess of


a slow or no-wake speed within fifty (50) yards of a vessel


displaying a flag as required by this subsection.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-203 CN 12/18/2024 10:04:49 AM































Req. No. 203 Page 7